Utah statutes.
15-4-6.7.   Medical expenses of minor children -- Collection pursuant to court or administrative order of child support.

(1)  When a court order has been entered providing for the payment of medical expenses of a minor child pursuant to Section 30-3-5, 30-4-3, or 78B-12-212, or an administrative order under Section 62A-11-326, a creditor who has been provided a copy of the order may not make a claim for unpaid medical expenses against a parent who has paid in full that share of the medical and dental expenses required to be paid by that parent under the order.

(2)  When a court order has been entered providing for the payment of medical and dental expenses of a minor child pursuant to Section 30-3-5, 30-4-3, or 78B-12-212, or an administrative order under Section 62A-11-326 and the creditor receives a copy of the order, the creditor may not make a negative credit report under Section 70C-7-107, or report of the debtor's repayment practices or credit history under Title 7, Chapter 14, Credit Information Exchange, regarding a parent who has paid in full that share of the medical and dental expenses required to be paid by that parent under the order.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

